District of Columbia statutes.
32-221

Loitering around business establishments prohibited during school hours; penalty.

No owner or employee of a business establishment shall permit a minor under the age of 16, having reasonable grounds to believe that such minor is a truant or unlawfully absent from school, to loiter on the premises of such business establishment during those hours when school is in session. Any person violating the provisions of this section may be fined not less than $25 nor more than $300, or may be imprisoned for not less than 10 days or longer than 30 days.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 24
renumbered as § 21 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(25), 23 DCR 527
1981 Ed., § 36-521.
1973 Ed., § 36-224.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 5-88: Mayor’s Order 85-28, March 11, 1985.
Amendment of regulations: Section 2 of D.C. Law 5-88 amended Article 36 of the Police Regulations of the District of Columbia (Commissioner’s Order No. 301, 904/1, effective Nov. 1, 1948) which provides for the regulation of video arcades and mechanical amusement machines.